Florida, session 2026, SB1374.
Be It Enacted by the Legislature of the State of Florida: 25 26 Section 1.âSection 390.111, Florida Statutes, is created to 27 read: 28 390.111âCivil remedies for abortion.â 29 (1)âDEFINITIONS.âAs used in this section, the term: 30 (a)ââClawback provisionâ means a law of another state 31 authorizing a civil action or penalty against a person for 32 bringing, attempting to bring, assisting, or providing legal 33 representation in an action authorized by this section. 34 (b)ââFamily memberâ means the spouse, parent, or sibling of 35 a woman upon whom an abortion was induced or performed, or upon 36 whom an abortion was attempted to be induced or performed. The 37 term also includes the father of the unborn child. 38 (2)âCAUSE OF ACTION.â 39 (a)âA family member has a civil cause of action against any 40 person who violates s. 390.0111(2) whether the violation 41 originates in this state or another jurisdiction. 42 (b)âA person, regardless of whether a citizen or resident 43 of this state, who personally or through an agent violates s. 44 390.0111(2), is under the jurisdiction of the courts of this 45 state for the causes of action in this subsection and subsection 46 (5). 47 (c)âNotwithstanding any contractual provision to the 48 contrary, general law applies to any action brought under this 49 section. 50 (d)âThe actual inducement or performance of an abortion is 51 not required to commence an action authorized by this section. 52 (e)âIt is not a defense to a suit brought under this 53 section that: 54 1.âThe woman upon whom the abortion was induced or 55 performed, or upon whom the abortion was attempted to be induced 56 or performed, consented to any procedure or action. 57 2.âThe law of a foreign state or foreign country permits 58 the action that forms the basis for the suit. 59 (f)âNotwithstanding any other provision in this section, a 60 cause of action may not be commenced under this section against 61 a woman upon whom an abortion was induced or performed, or upon 62 whom an abortion was attempted to be induced or performed. 63 (3)âDAMAGES.âA court may enter a judgment awarding the 64 prevailing plaintiff any of the following: 65 (a)âInjunctive relief. 66 (b)âStatutory damages. 67 (c)âReasonable costs and attorney fees. 68 (4)âLIMITATIONS PERIOD.âAn action brought under subsection 69 (2) must be commenced within 2 years after the cause of action 70 accrues. 71 (5)âCLAWBACK PROVISIONS.â 72 (a)âA court or an authority of this state may not 73 recognize, enforce, or give effect to a judgment or an order 74 issued under a clawback provision, except to the extent required 75 by the United States Constitution. 76 (b)1.âA person against whom an action is brought or a 77 judgment is entered under a clawback provision may bring a civil 78 action against any person who brought such action, obtained such 79 judgment, or sought to enforce such judgment, and a court may 80 enter a judgment awarding the person against whom the clawback 81 action was brought any of the following: 82 a.âInjunctive relief. 83 b.âActual damages, which includes any amount awarded in an 84 action based on a clawback provision. 85 c.âReasonable costs and attorney fees incurred in bringing 86 such action, or incurred in defending or responding to the 87 action based on the clawback provision. 88 2.âIt is not a defense to an action brought under this 89 paragraph that the plaintiff failed to seek relief in the 90 clawback proceeding or that a court in another jurisdiction did 91 not grant relief. 92 (6)âPROTECTION OF PRIVACY IN COURT PROCEEDINGS.âIn each 93 civil action brought under this section, the court may require 94 all pleadings, orders, and other formal documents to be styled 95 in a manner to protect the name of the woman upon whom an 96 abortion was induced or performed, or upon whom an abortion was 97 attempted to be induced or performed, from public disclosure. 98 (7)âCONSTRUCTION.âThis section shall be liberally construed 99 to effectuate its remedial purposes. 100 Section 2.âIf any provision of this act or its application 101 to any person or circumstance is held invalid, the invalidity 102 does not affect other provisions or applications of the act 103 which can be given effect without the invalid provision or 104 application, and to this end the provisions of this act are 105 severable. 106 Section 3.âThis act shall take effect July 1, 2026.